Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1241
All vessels; floatation device; requirements; exceptions.

(1) Every vessel except sailboards shall carry at least one life preserver, ring buoy, or other device of the sort prescribed by the regulations of the commission for each person on board, so placed as to be readily accessible, except that every vessel carrying passengers for hire shall carry so placed as to be readily accessible at least one life preserver of the sort prescribed by the regulations of the commission for each person on board. Every vessel except canoes, kayaks, sailboards, and personal watercraft shall carry at least one throwable floatation device which shall be in addition to the devices required for each person on board.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any racing shell or rowing scull during an authorized race or regatta or an officially supervised training session if at least one approved floatation device is carried aboard an accompanying vessel for each person in such racing shell or rowing scull. Such floatation devices shall be in addition to those required for each person aboard the accompanying vessel.

(3) For purposes of this section, sailboard means a surfboard-type vessel with no freeboard and using a free-sail system with a swivel-mounted mast not secured to a hull by guys or stays.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 41;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 40;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 117.